Maryland, session 2025, HB1046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
– 1 –

Ch. 207 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–404.
(a) (1) A guarantor shall fulfill the guarantor’s guaranty according to its
terms:
(i) Within a reasonable time; and
(ii) For the stated period of the guaranty or, if no period is stated, for
a reasonable period of time.
(2) A provider shall fulfill the obligations under the service contract
according to its terms:
(i) At or within the period stated in the service contract, or if no
period is stated, within a reasonable time; and
(ii) For the stated duration of the service contract.
(b) (1) (i) A guaranty is extended automatically when a guarantor fails to
repair successfully a malfunctioning or defective product within the guaranty period.
(ii) The guaranty does not terminate until the consumer product
successfully performs its intended function for the remaining period of the guaranty plus a
period equal to the time of repair.
(2) (i) A service contract is extended automatically when the provider
fails to perform the services under the service contract.
(ii) The service contract does not terminate until the services are
provided in accordance with the terms of the service contract.
(c) If a guaranty fails to disclose the information required by § 14–403 of this
subtitle, the guarantor shall, without charge and within a reasonable period of time:
(1) Repair a malfunctioning or defective consumer product; or
(2) If repair is not commercially practicable or cannot be timely made,
replace the malfunctioning or defective consumer product.
(d) (1) If a guarantor is unable to fulfill the terms of the guaranty within 10
days of the tender or delivery of a consumer product to the guarantor, the guarantor shall
provide on request of the person guaranteed a brief written explanation of the reasons for
the delay.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 207
(2) If a provider is unable to fulfill the terms of the service contract within
10 days after the date on which the provider is required to perform obligations under the
service contract, the provider shall provide on request of the person guaranteed a brief
written explanation of the reasons for the delay.
Article – Transportation
15–311.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agent” means a business entity that is authorized by an obligor or a
licensed vehicle dealer to sell a mechanical repair contract.
(3) (i) “Mechanical repair contract” means any agreement or contract
sold by a licensed vehicle dealer, an obligor, or an agent under which the obligor agrees to
perform over a fixed period of time, for a specific duration, and for a specific identifiable
price, provided that the purchase of the contract is optional to the purchaser, any of the
following services:
1. The repair, replacement, or maintenance of a motor
vehicle, or the indemnification for the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a motor
vehicle, for the operational or structural failure of the motor vehicle due to a defect in
materials, workmanship, or normal wear and tear, with or without additional provisions
for incidental payment of indemnity for services including towing, rental and emergency
road service, and road hazard protection;
2. The repair, replacement, or maintenance of a motor
vehicle for the operational or structural failure of one or more parts or systems of the motor
vehicle brought about by the failure of an additive product to perform as represented;
3. The repair or replacement of tires or wheels on a motor
vehicle damaged as a result of coming into contact with road hazards, including potholes,
rocks, wood debris, metal parts, glass, plastic, curbs, or composite scraps;
4. The removal and repair of dents, dings, or creases on a
motor vehicle using the process of paintless dent removal;
5. The repair of chips or cracks in, or the replacement of,
motor vehicle windshields as a result of damage caused by road hazards;
6. The replacement of a motor vehicle key or key fob if the
key or key fob becomes inoperable or is lost or stolen; or
7. Other services or products that may be approved by the
Insurance Commissioner if consistent with the provisions of this section.
– 3 –

Ch. 207 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) “Mechanical repair contract” includes extended warranties and
extended service contracts.
(iii) “Mechanical repair contract” does not include:
1. Warranties under the Magnuson–Moss Warranty Act, 15
U.S.C. § 2301, et seq.;
2. Contracts or agreements for regular maintenance only; or
3. An agreement between a motor club, as defined in §
26–101 of the Insurance Article, and a member or subscriber of the motor club.
(4) (i) “Obligor” means the person specified in a mechanical repair
contract that is contractually obligated to perform the services set forth in the mechanical
repair contract.
(ii) “Obligor” does not include an insurer that provides insurance
coverage in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.
(e) A mechanical repair contract shall be offered in addition to any express
warranty originally included as part of the contract for sale of a new motor vehicle.
(f) A mechanical repair contract shall clearly and conspicuously set forth the date
when the warranty begins.
(g) A mechanical repair contract shall clearly and conspicuously set forth the date
or the odometer reading at which the warranty expires and the name and address of the
insurer issuing the policy of insurance as described in subsection (b) of this section.
(h) The repair of a malfunction or defect covered under a mechanical repair
contract shall include the cost of the teardown and diagnosing the malfunction or defect.
(i) (1) The provisions of the Maryland Consumer Products Guaranty Act, Title
14, Subtitle 4 of the Commercial Law Article, apply to a mechanical repair contract sold in
the State.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSED VEHICLE
DEALERS, OBLIGORS, AND AGENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 14–404 OF THE
COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE, A LICENSED VEHICLE DEALER, AN OBLIGOR, OR AN
AGENT:
(I) MAY NOT MAKE DECEPTIVE OR MISLEADING STATEMENTS
REGARDING A MECHANICAL REPAIR CONTRACT; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 207
(II) SHALL ENSURE THAT TESTIMONIALS OF ANY OF THEIR
ENDORSERS ARE TRUTHFUL, ACCURATE, AND NOT DECEPTIVE.
14–404.1.
(A) A MECHANICAL REPAIR CONTRACT UNDER § 15–311.2 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE MAY NOT CONTAIN A PROVISION PRECLUDING
COVERAGE SOLELY FOR AN ISSUE WITH A MOTOR VEHICLE IDENTIFIED IN A
TECHNICAL SERVICE BULLETIN.
(B) A GUARANTOR OR PROVIDER MAY NOT DENY A MECHANICAL REPAIR
CONTRACT CLAIM SOLELY BECAUSE THE DIAGNOSED ISSUE WITH THE MOTOR
VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE CLAIM WAS MADE WAS IDENTIFIED IN A TECHNICAL
SERVICE BULLETIN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 5 –